Illinois, session 104th, HB4538.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Identity Verification for Consumer Services Act. 6    Section 5. Purpose. The purpose of this Act is to protect 7Illinois residents from identity theft by establishing 8mandatory identity verification standards before allowing the 9issuance of services that involve personal identifying 10information, including credit services, telecommunications, 11utilities, online platforms, healthcare access, and government 12benefit systems. 13    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:14    "Covered service" means any utility, telecommunications, 15credit account, online financial account, government benefit, 16or other service that uses personal identifying information to 17authorize access or extend service to those accounts or 18benefits. "Covered service" includes any service that involves 19a high-risk transaction. "Covered service" does not include 20any public utility as defined in Section 3-105 of the Public 21Utilities Act, alternative retail electric supplier as defined 22in Section 16-102 of the Public Utilities Act, or alternative   HB4538 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 17029 SPS 30444 b1gas supplier as defined in Section 19-105 of the Public 2Utilities Act.3    "High-risk transaction" means any transaction involving 4the transfer of funds, issuance of credit, remote access to 5financial records, or any financial service activation that 6may expose personal identifying information.7    "Identity theft" means the unauthorized acquisition and 8use of personal identifying information to fraudulently obtain 9credit, benefits, or services.10    "Identity verification" means the process of verifying a 11person's identity using 2 of the following forms of 12authentication:13        (1) valid, government-issued photo identification;14        (2) proof of address, such as a recent utility bill, 15    bank statement, or rental lease;16        (3) biometric data, such as a fingerprint or facial 17    scan;18        (4) secure digital verification through multi-factor 19    authentication; or20        (5) knowledge-based authentication.21    "Personal identifying information" includes, but is not 22limited to, full name, date of birth, social security number, 23driver's license or State identification card number, passport 24number, biometric identifiers, physical address, email 25address, telephone number, financial account numbers, 26insurance policy numbers, and medical or health-related   HB4538 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 17029 SPS 30444 b1information. 2    Section 15. Identity verification requirements. An entity 3that engages in a high-risk transaction involving a covered 4service shall use identity verification to verify a person's 5identity before initiating or modifying an agreement to 6provide the covered service. 7    Section 20. Recordkeeping. An entity that provides a 8covered service shall securely retain a record of the 9documentation collected under the identity verification 10process required under Section 15 for 3 years after the 11identity verification or as long as needed for identity 12verification purposes. 13    Section 25. Exemptions. The following are exempt from the 14requirements of this Act:15        (1) services exclusively performed using in-person 16    physical identification checks;17        (2) services for individuals under the age of 13 with 18    verified parental consent, as required under State and 19    federal law;20        (3) entities that are already subject to more 21    stringent federal identity verification regulations, 22    including, but not limited to, the customer identification 23    program regulations adopted by the Financial Crimes   HB4538 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 17029 SPS 30444 b1    Enforcement Network of the United States Department of the 2    Treasury;3        (4) the Early Intervention Program when acting in 4    accordance with 89 Ill. Adm. Code 500 and regulations 5    adopted under Part C of the Individuals with Disabilities 6    Education Act (34 CFR 303.112(b)) for the purpose of 7    verifying identities; and8        (5) the Child Care Assistance Program when acting in 9    accordance with 89 Ill. Adm. Code 500 and regulations 10    adopted under the Child Care and Development Block Grant 11    Act (45 CFR 98.20(c)) for the purpose of verifying 12    identities. 13    Section 30. Enforcement. A violation of this Act 14constitutes an unlawful practice under the Consumer Fraud and 15Deceptive Business Practices Act. All remedies, penalties, and 16authority granted to the Attorney General by the Consumer 17Fraud and Deceptive Business Practices Act shall be available 18to the Attorney General for the enforcement of this Act. 19    Section 35. Whistleblower protections. Any employee or 20agent of an entity that provides a covered service in this 21State who reports in good faith the entity's noncompliance 22with this Act shall be protected under the Whistleblower Act. 23    Section 40. Home rule. A home rule unit may not regulate   HB4538 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 17029 SPS 30444 b1identity verification in a manner inconsistent with the 2regulation by the State of identity verification under this 3Act. This Section is a limitation under subsection (i) of 4Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on the 5concurrent exercise by home rule units of powers and functions 6exercised by the State. 7    Section 90. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 8Practices Act is amended by adding Section 2MMMM as follows: 9    (815 ILCS 505/2MMMM new)10    Sec. 2MMMM. Violations of the Identity Verification for 11Consumer Services Act. Any person who violates the Identity 12Verification for Consumer Services Act commits an unlawful 13practice within the meaning of this Act.  14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 151, 2027.